Tennessee, session 114, SB0355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-10-108, is amended by deleting
"members of the commission" and substituting "the governor, members of the commission".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0355
001929
- 1 -